Connecticut, session 2026, SB00273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 7-411 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 [Such] The civil service board shall, [within] not later than ninety
4 days after the initial appointment of such commissioners, classify all the
5 officers and employees in the departments for which the merit system
6 has been adopted, except elective officers, as provided in section 7-407.
7 [; and the] The board may, [also,] in its discretion, exempt from test and
8 competition the officer responsible for the policy of any department, and
9 one deputy, private secretary or other confidential employee of such
10 officer. The officers and employees so classified by such board shall
11 constitute the classified civil service, and no appointment of any such
12 officer or employment of any such employee shall be made except in
13 accordance with the rules hereinafter provided for.
SB273 / File No. 53 1

SB273 File No. 53
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-411
PD Joint Favorable
SB273 / File No. 53 2

SB273 File No. 53
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes technical changes which do not result in a fiscal
impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB273 / File No. 53 3

SB273 File No. 53
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 273
AN ACT CONCERNING LOCAL GOVERNMENT.